New Jersey, session 221, A1311.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-7) is amended to read as follows: 6.    The board shall establish the policy and contract forms and benefit levels to be made available by all carriers for the health benefits plans required to be issued pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4), and shall adopt such modifications to one or more plans as the board determines are necessary to make available a "high deductible health plan" or plans consistent with [section 301 of Title III of the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-191] the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of section 220 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.220, regarding tax-deductible medical savings accounts, within 60 days after the enactment of P.L.1997, c.414 (C.54A:3-4 et al.), and shall adopt such modifications to one or more plans as the board determines are necessary to make available a "high deductible health plan" or plans consistent with the provisions of paragraph (2) of  subsection (c) of section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.223, regarding tax-deductible health savings accounts, within 60 days after the enactment of P.L.   , c.    (C.       ) (now pending before the Legislature as this bill). The board shall provide the commissioner with an informational filing of the policy and contract forms and benefit levels it establishes. a.     The individual health benefits plans established by the board may include cost containment measures such as, but not limited to: utilization review of health care services, including review of medical necessity of hospital and physician services; case management benefit alternatives; selective contracting with hospitals, physicians, and other health care providers; and reasonable benefit differentials applicable to participating and nonparticipating providers; and other managed care provisions. b.    An individual health benefits plan offered pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4) shall contain a limitation of no more than 12 months on coverage for preexisting conditions.  An individual health benefits plan offered pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4) shall not contain a preexisting condition limitation of any period under the following circumstances: (1) to an individual who has, under creditable coverage, with no intervening lapse in coverage of more than 31 days, been treated or diagnosed by a physician for a condition under that plan or satisfied a 12-month preexisting condition limitation; or (2) to a federally defined eligible individual who applies for an individual health benefits plan within 63 days of termination of the prior coverage. c.     In addition to the five standard individual health benefits plans provided for in section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4), the board may develop up to five rider packages.  Premium rates for the rider packages shall be determined in accordance with section 8 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-9). d.    After the board's establishment of the individual health benefits plans required pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4), and notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a carrier shall file the policy or contract forms with the board and certify to the board that the health benefits plans to be used by the carrier are in substantial compliance with the provisions in the corresponding board approved plans.  The certification shall be signed by the chief executive officer of the carrier.  Upon receipt by the board of the certification, the certified plans may be used until the board, after notice and hearing, disapproves their continued use. e.     Effective immediately for an individual health benefits plan issued on or after the effective date of P.L.1995, c.316 (C.17:48E-35.10 et al.) and effective on the first 12-month anniversary date of an individual health benefits plan in effect on the effective date of P.L.1995, c.316 (C.17:48E-35.10 et al.), the individual health benefits plans required pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4), including any plan offered by a federally qualified health maintenance organization, shall contain benefits for expenses incurred in the following: (1)  Screening by blood lead measurement for lead poisoning for children, including confirmatory blood lead testing as specified by the Department of Health pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1995, c.316 (C.26:2-137.1); and medical evaluation and any necessary medical follow-up and treatment for lead poisoned children. (2) All childhood immunizations as recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the United States Public Health Service and the Department of Health pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1995, c.316 (C.26:2-137.1). A carrier shall notify its insureds, in writing, of any change in the health care services provided with respect to childhood immunizations and any related changes in premium.  Such notification shall be in a form and manner to be determined by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance. (3) Screening for newborn hearing loss by appropriate electrophysiologic screening measures and periodic monitoring of infants for delayed onset hearing loss, pursuant to P.L.2001, c.373 (C.26:2-103.1 et al.). Payment for this screening service shall be separate and distinct from payment for routine new baby care in the form of a newborn hearing screening fee as negotiated with the provider and facility. The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the health benefits plan, except that no deductible shall be applied for benefits provided pursuant to this subsection.  This subsection shall apply to all individual health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. f.     Effective immediately for a health benefits plan issued on or after the effective date of P.L.2001, c.361 (C.17:48-6z et al.) and effective on the first 12-month anniversary date of a health benefits plan in effect on the effective date of P.L.2001, c.361 (C.17:48-6z et al.), the health benefits plans required pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-4) that provide benefits for expenses incurred in the purchase of prescription drugs shall provide benefits for expenses incurred in the purchase of specialized non-standard infant formulas, when the covered infant's physician has diagnosed the infant as having multiple food protein intolerance and has determined such formula to be medically necessary, and when the covered infant has not been responsive to trials of standard non-cow milk-based formulas, including soybean and goat milk.  The coverage may be subject to utilization review, including periodic review, of the continued medical necessity of the specialized infant formula. The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other prescribed items under the health benefits plan. This subsection shall apply to all individual health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. (cf: P.L.2001, c.373, s.14) 2.    Section 17 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-33) is amended to read as follows: 17.  Subject to the approval of the commissioner, the board shall formulate the five health benefits plans to be made available by small employer carriers in accordance with the provisions of this act, and shall promulgate five standard forms pursuant thereto.  The board may establish benefit levels, deductibles and co-payments, exclusions, and limitations for such health benefits plans in accordance with the law. The board shall ensure that the means exist for a carrier to offer high deductible health benefits plan options that are consistent with [section 301 of Title III of the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996," Pub.L. 104-191,] the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of section 220 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.220, regarding tax-deductible medical savings accounts and with the provisions of paragraph (2) of  subsection (c) of section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.223, regarding tax-deductible health savings accounts. The board shall submit the forms so established to the commissioner for approval.  The commissioner shall approve the forms if the commissioner finds them to be consistent with the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1992, c. 162 (C.17B:27A-19).  Any form submitted to the commissioner by the board shall be deemed approved if not expressly disapproved in writing within 60 days of its receipt by the commissioner.  Such forms may contain, but shall not be limited to, the following provisions: a.     Utilization review of health care services, including review of medical necessity of hospital and physician services; b.    Managed care systems, including large case management; c.     Provisions for selective contracting with hospitals, physicians, and other participating and nonparticipating providers; d.    Reasonable benefits differentials which are applicable to participating and nonparticipating providers; e.     Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-20) to the contrary, the board may, from time to time, adjust coinsurance and deductibles; f.     Such other provisions which may be quantifiably established to be cost containment devices; g.    The department shall publish annually a list of the premiums charged for each of the five small employer health benefits plans and for any rider package by all carriers writing such plans.  The department shall also publish the toll free telephone number of each such carrier. (cf: P.L.1997, c.146, s.13) 3.    N.J.S.54A:3-3 is amended to read as follows: 54A:3-3.  Medical expenses. (a) Each taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from the taxpayer's gross income medical expenses for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and the taxpayer's dependents with respect to such expenses that were paid during the taxable year and to the extent that such medical expenses exceed 2% of the taxpayer's gross income. In the case of a nonresident, gross income shall mean gross income which such nonresident would have reported if the taxpayer had been subject to tax during the entire taxable year as a resident. (b)   Special Rule for Decedents. (1)   Treatment of expenses paid after death.  Expenses for the medical care of the taxpayer which are paid out of the taxpayer's estate during the one-year period beginning with the day after the day of the death shall be treated as paid by the taxpayer at the time incurred. (2)   Limitation. Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the amount paid is not allowable as a deduction in computing medical expense deductions for federal income tax purposes. (c)   Disallowance of amounts allowed for other purposes. (1)   Any expenses allowed as a deduction of expenses for household and dependent care services necessary for gainful employment shall not be allowed as an expense paid for medical care for purposes of this section. (2)   Any amounts paid or distributed out of a medical savings account that are excluded from gross income pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1997, c.414 (C.54A:6-27), or paid or distributed out of a health savings account that are excluded from gross income pursuant to section 6 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (now pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall not be allowed as an expense paid for medical care for purposes of this section. (3) Any amounts allowed as a deduction for the health insurance costs of the self-employed pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1999, c.222 (C.54A:3-5) shall not be allowed as an expense paid for medical care for purposes of this section. (cf: P.L.1999, c.222, s.2) 4.    N.J.S.54A:5-1 is amend to read as follows: 54A:5-1.  New Jersey Gross Income Defined.  New Jersey gross income shall consist of the following categories of income: a.     Salaries, wages, tips, fees, commissions, bonuses, and other remuneration received for services rendered whether in cash or in property, and amounts paid or distributed, or deemed paid or distributed, out of a medical savings account that are not excluded from gross income pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1997, c.414 (C.54A:6-27), or out of a health savings account that are not excluded from gross income pursuant to section 6 of P.L.   ,c.      (C.        ) (now pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    Net profits from business.  The net income from the operation of a business, profession or other activity after provision for all costs and expenses incurred in the conduct thereof, determined either on a cash or accrual basis in accordance with the method of accounting allowed for federal income tax purposes but without deduction of the amount of: (1)  taxes based on income; (2) a civil, civil administrative, or criminal penalty or fine, including a penalty or fine under an administrative consent order, assessed and collected for a violation of a State or federal environmental law, an administrative consent order, or an environmental ordinance or resolution of a local governmental entity, and any interest earned on the penalty or fine, and any economic benefits having accrued to the violator as a result of a violation, which benefits are assessed and recovered in a civil, civil administrative, or criminal action, or pursuant to an administrative consent order.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to a penalty or fine assessed or collected for a violation of a State or federal environmental law, or local environmental ordinance or resolution, if the penalty or fine was for a violation that resulted from fire, riot, sabotage, flood, storm event, natural cause, or other act of God beyond the reasonable control of the violator, or caused by an act or omission of a person who was outside the reasonable control of the violator; and (3) treble damages paid to the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to subsection a. of section 7 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11f) for costs incurred by the department in removing, or arranging for the removal of, an unauthorized discharge upon the failure of the discharger to comply with a directive from the department to remove, or arrange for the removal of, a discharge. c.     Net gains or income from disposition of property.  Net gains or net income, less net losses, derived from the sale, exchange or other disposition of property, including real or personal, whether tangible or intangible as determined in accordance with the method of accounting allowed for federal income tax purposes.  For the purpose of determining gain or loss, the basis of property shall be the adjusted basis used for federal income tax purposes, except as expressly provided for under this act, but without a deduction for penalties, fines, or economic benefits excepted pursuant to paragraph (2), or for treble damages excepted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection b. of this section. A taxpayer's net gain or loss on the sale, exchange or other disposition of a share of an S corporation shall be calculated by increasing the adjusted basis of the share by an amount equal to the shareholder's net losses and deductions in respect of the share allowed and deducted from income for federal income tax purposes, not including any personal net operating loss deductions, to the extent that such net losses were not offset by the taxpayer's pro rata share of S corporation income otherwise subject to taxation pursuant to subsection p. of this section in respect of another S corporation, subject to rules of priority and assignment determined by the director. For the tax year 1976, any taxpayer with a tax liability under this subsection, or under the "Tax on Capital Gains and Other Unearned Income Act," P.L.1975, c.172 (C.54:8B-1 et seq.), shall not be subject to payment of an amount greater than the amount he would have paid if either return had covered all capital transactions during the full tax year 1976; provided, however, that the rate which shall apply to any capital gain shall be that in effect on the date of the transaction.  To the extent that any loss is used to offset any gain under P.L.1975, c.172, it shall not be used to offset any gain under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. The term "net gains or income" shall not include gains or income derived from obligations which are referred to in clause (1) or (2) of N.J.S.54A:6-14 of this act or from securities which evidence ownership in a qualified investment fund as defined in section 2 of P.L.1987, c.310 (C.54A:6-14.1). The term "net gains or net income" shall not include gains or income from transactions to the extent to which nonrecognition is allowed for federal income tax purposes. The term "sale, exchange or other disposition" shall not include the exchange of stock or securities in a corporation a party to a reorganization in pursuance of a plan of reorganization, solely for stock or securities in such corporation or in another corporation a party to the reorganization and the transfer of property to a corporation by one or more persons solely in exchange for stock or securities in such corporation if immediately after the exchange such person or persons are in control of the corporation.  For purposes of this clause, stock or securities issued for services shall not be considered as issued in return for property. For purposes of this clause, the term "reorganization" means-- (i) A statutory merger or consolidation; (ii) The acquisition by one corporation, in exchange solely for all or part of its voting stock (or in exchange solely for all or a part of the voting stock of a corporation which is in control of the acquiring corporation) of stock of another corporation if, immediately after the acquisition, the acquiring corporation has control of such other corporation (whether or not such acquiring corporation had control immediately before the acquisition); (iii) The acquisition by one corporation, in exchange solely for all or part of its voting stock (or in exchange solely for all or a part of the voting stock of a corporation which is in control of the acquiring corporation), of substantially all of the properties of another corporation, but in determining whether the exchange is solely for stock the assumption by the acquiring corporation of a liability of the other, or the fact that property acquired is subject to a liability, shall be disregarded; (iv) A transfer by a corporation of all or a part of its assets to another corporation if immediately after the transfer the transferor, or one or more of its shareholders (including persons who were shareholders immediately before the transfer), or any combination thereof, is in control of the corporation to which the assets are transferred; (v) A recapitalization; (vi) A mere change in identity, form, or place of organization however effected; or (vii)  The acquisition by one corporation, in exchange for stock of a corporation (referred to in this subclause as "controlling corporation") which is in control of the acquiring corporation, of substantially all of the properties of another corporation which in the transaction is merged into the acquiring corporation shall not disqualify a transaction under subclause (i) if such transaction would have qualified under subclause (i) if the merger had been into the controlling corporation, and no stock of the acquiring corporation is used in the transaction; (viii) A transaction otherwise qualifying under subclause (i) shall not be disqualified by reason of the fact that stock of a corporation (referred to in this subclause as the "controlling corporation") which before the merger was in control of the merged corporation is used in the transaction, if after the transaction, the corporation surviving the merger holds substantially all of its properties and of the properties of the merged corporation (other than stock of the controlling corporation distributed in the transaction); and in the transaction, former shareholders of the surviving corporation exchanged, for an amount of voting stock of the controlling corporation, an amount of stock in the surviving corporation which constitutes control of such corporation. For purposes of this clause, the term "control" means the ownership of stock possessing at least 80% of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote and at least 80% of the total number of shares of all other classes of stock of the corporation. For purposes of this clause, the term "a party to a reorganization" includes a corporation resulting from a reorganization, and both corporations, in the case of a reorganization resulting from the acquisition by one corporation of stock or properties of another.  In the case of a reorganization qualifying under subclause (i) by reason of subclause (vii) the term "a party to a reorganization" includes the controlling corporation referred to in such subclause (vii). Notwithstanding any provisions hereof, upon every such exchange or conversion, the taxpayer's basis for the stock or securities received shall be the same as the taxpayer's actual or attributed basis for the stock, securities or property surrendered in exchange therefor. d.    Net gains or net income derived from or in the form of rents, royalties, patents, and copyrights. e.     Interest, except interest referred to in clause (1) or (2) of N.J.S.54A:6-14, or distributions paid by a qualified investment fund as defined in section 2 of P.L.1987, c.310 (C.54A:6-14.1), to the extent provided in that section. f.     Dividends. "Dividends" means any distribution in cash or property made by a corporation, association or business trust that is not an S corporation, (1) out of accumulated earnings and profits, or (2) out of earnings and profits of the year in which such dividend is paid and any distribution in cash or property made by an S corporation, as specifically determined pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1993, c.173 (C.54A:5-14). The term "dividends" shall not include distributions paid by a qualified investment fund as defined in section 2 of P.L.1987, c.310 (C.54A:6-14.1), to the extent provided in that section. g.    Gambling winnings. h.    Net gains or income derived through estates or trusts. i.     Income in respect of a decedent. j.     Amounts distributed or withdrawn from an employee trust attributable to contributions to the trust which were excluded from gross income under the provisions of chapter 6 of Title 54A of the New Jersey Statutes, amounts rolled over from an IRA, as defined pursuant to subsection (a) of section 408 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.408, that is not a Roth IRA, as defined pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1998, c.57 (C.54A:6-28) to an IRA that is a Roth IRA, and pensions and annuities except to the extent of exclusions in N.J.S.54A:6-10 hereunder, notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.18A:66-51, P.L.1973, c.140, s.41 (C.43:6A-41), P.L.1954, c.84, s.53 (C.43:15A-53), P.L.1944, c.255, s.17 (C.43:16A-17), P.L.1965, c.89, s.45 (C.53:5A-45), R.S.43:10-14, P.L.1943, c.160, s.22 (C.43:10-18.22), P.L.1948, c.310, s.22 (C.43:10-18.71), P.L.1954, c.218, s.32 (C.43:13-22.34), P.L.1964, c.275, s.11 (C.43:13-22.60), R.S.43:10-57, P.L.1938, c.330, s.13 (C.43:10-105), R.S.43:13-44, and P.L.1943, c.189, s.5 (C.43:13-37.5). k.    Distributive share of partnership income. l.     Amounts received as prizes and awards, except as provided in N.J.S.54A:6-8 and N.J.S.54A:6-11 hereunder. m.   Rental value of a residence furnished by an employer or a rental allowance paid by an employer to provide a home. n.    Alimony and separate maintenance payments to the extent that such payments are required to be made under a decree of divorce or separate maintenance but not including payments for support of minor children. o.    Income, gain or profit derived from acts or omissions defined as crimes or offenses under the laws of this State or any other jurisdiction. p.    Net pro rata share of S corporation income. (cf: P.L.1998, c.57, s.1) 5.    (New section)  A taxpayer may deduct from the taxpayer's gross income an amount equal to the contributions to a health savings account that the taxpayer is allowed for the taxable year as a deduction for federal income tax purposes pursuant to section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.223. 6.    (New section)  Gross income shall not include any increase in the value of a taxpayer's health savings account or the payments or distributions from a health savings account of a taxpayer that are excluded from the taxpayer's federal gross income pursuant to section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.223.  Gross income shall not include a rollover contribution to a taxpayer's health savings account that if it meets the requirements of a rollover contribution for federal income tax purposes described in paragraph (5) of subsection (f) of section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.223, or in paragraph (5) of subsection (f) of section 220 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.220. 7.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017.